Utah statutes.
63J-3-204.   Exceptions to limitation -- Fiscal emergency -- Requirements -- Limits modified or exceeded by vote of the people.

(1) (a)  The limits as provided in this chapter may be exceeded if a fiscal emergency is declared.

(b)  A fiscal emergency for the state shall be declared by the governor and confirmed by more than two-thirds of both houses of the Legislature.

(2) (a)  Funding for fiscal emergencies may not be included in the appropriations base for computing the maximum allowable appropriations in subsequent years.

(b)  Fiscal emergency appropriations shall remain separate from appropriations subject to limits imposed by this chapter and shall be assigned expiration dates.

(3)  Any limit in this chapter may be exceeded or modified by a majority vote of the people in a statewide election.

